Oklahoma, session 2026, SB468.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 301 of Title 19, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Upon the effective date of this act, a municipality of this


state located within a county with a population of more than four


hundred fifty thousand (450,000) according to the latest Federal


Decennial Census shall transmit a copy of any building permit issued


within its boundaries to the county assessor no later than thirty


(30) days after the date of issuance. A municipality shall provide


the county assessor with electronic copies of building permits,


where available and feasible.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1184 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:36:58 AM

Req. No. 1184 Page 1